Hawaii statutes.
§128D-2.5 Toxicologists. The
department may establish permanent exempt positions known as toxicologists for
the purpose of assessing human health risk. The positions shall be appointed
by the director without regard to chapter 76. [L 1997, c 146, §2; am L 2000, c
253, §150; am L 2015, c 185, §7]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next